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DTC P0748/62 Pressure Control Solenoid ”A” Electrical
(ShiftSolenoidValveSL 1)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Shifting from 1st to5th isperformed incombinationwithONandOFFof theshift solenoidvalvesS 1,S2,
SR,SL 1 andSL2,controlledbyEngineandECTECU. Ifanopenorshort circuit occurs ineitherof theshift
solenoid valves, the Engine and ECT ECU controls the remaining normal shift solenoid valve to allow the
vehicle to be operated smoothly (Fail safe function).
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Fail Safe Function:
If either of the shift solenoid valve circuits develops an open or short, the Engine and ECT ECU turns the
other shift solenoid ON and OFF to shift to the gear ranges shown in the table below.
Manual shifting as shown in the following table must be done (In the case of a short circuit, the Engine and
ECT ECU stops sending current to the short circuited solenoid).

� :ONX:OFF
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DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P0748/62

Engine and ECT ECU checks for an open or short circuit in
shift solenoidvalvesSL 1 (1−tripdetection logic)
(a) When solenoid is energized, duty ratio exceed 75%
(b) When solenoid is not energized, duty ratio is less than 3%

SOpenorshort inshift solenoidvalveSL 1 circuit
SShift solenoidvalveSL 1
SEngineandECTECU

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check transmission wire.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the trasmission wire connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between SL1+ and SL1− of transmission
wire.
OK:

Resistance: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20˚C (68˚F)
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals SL1+ and SL1−  of the
transmission wire connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or higher

NG Go to step 3.

OK

2 Measure resistance between terminal SL1  + and SL1− of Engine and ECT ECU
connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the transmission wire connector.
(b) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals SL1+ and SL1− of En-
gine and ECT ECU connector.
OK:

Resistance: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20˚C (68˚F)
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals SL1+ and SL1−  of the
Engine and ECT ECU connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or higher

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN−38).

OK

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−38).
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3 Check shift solenoid valve SL1.

PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Remove the shift solenoid valve SL1.
CHECK:
(a) Measure the resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of so-

lenoid connector.
Standard: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20˚C (68˚F)

(b) Connect the positive (+) lead with an 21 W bulb to terminal
2 of solenoid connector and negative (−) lead to terminal
1 of the solenoid valve connector, then check the move-
ment of the valve.
Standard: Solenoid sounds operation noise.

OK:
Standard

NG Replace the shift solenoid valve SL1
(See page AT−8) .

OK

Repair or replace the transmission wire
(See page AT−6) .


